Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1643
Community health worker; training; endorsement; department; powers and duties.

On or before July 1, 2027, the department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that:

(1) Identify and maintain the core competencies required for community health worker training programs using the department's expertise in public health, behavioral health, workforce development, and medical assistance program alignment. The department shall periodically review and update the core competencies to ensure they reflect national best practices and community health needs;

(2) Define the application, approval, and renewal process for training endorsement;

(3) Set reasonable application and renewal fees;

(4) Establish procedures for denial, suspension, and revocation of a training endorsement;

(5) Approve training programs and training providers that meet established core competencies; and

(6) Provide that an individual who is aggrieved by a denial, suspension, or revocation of approval of a training endorsement may request a hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 4.
July 18, 2026
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.